Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.195

Conditional release—Court approval—Compliance—Secretary to coordinate with designated treatment providers, department of corrections staff, and local law enforcement—Rules.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

For persons who have received court approval for conditional release, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall supervise the person's compliance with the court-ordered conditions of release in coordination with the multidisciplinary transition team appointed under RCW 10.77.150. The level of supervision provided by the secretary shall correspond to the level of the person's public safety risk. In undertaking supervision of persons under this section, the secretary shall coordinate with any treatment providers or department of corrections staff designated pursuant to RCW 10.77.150, and local law enforcement, if appropriate. The secretary shall adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2021 c 263 s 10; 2010 c 263 s 9.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 263: See note following RCW 10.77.150.